California statutes. Penal Code
(d) A person who forges documentation reflecting the awarding of a military decoration that the person has not received for the purposes of obtaining money, property, or receiving a tangible benefit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) A person who knowingly, with the intent to impersonate and to deceive, for the purposes of obtaining money, property, or receiving a tangible benefit, misrepresents
 themselves as a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, the
 State Guard, or the Naval Militia by wearing the uniform or military decoration authorized for use by the members or veterans of those forces, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(f) A person who knowingly utilizes falsified military identification for the purposes of obtaining money, property, or receiving a tangible benefit, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(g) A person who knowingly, with the intent to impersonate, for the purposes of promoting a business, charity, or endeavor, misrepresents themselves as a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, the
 State Guard, or the Naval Militia by wearing the uniform or military decoration authorized for use by the members or veterans of those forces, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(h) A person who knowingly, with the intent to gain an advantage for employment purposes, misrepresents themselves, as a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, the State Guard, or the Naval Militia by wearing the uniform or military decoration authorized for use by the
 members or veterans of those forces, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(i) This section does not apply to face-to-face solicitations involving less than ten dollars ($10).

(j) This section, Section 3003 of the Government Code, and Section 1821 of the Military and Veterans Code shall be known, and may be cited as, the California Stolen Valor Act.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Military decoration” means any decoration or medal from the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, the State
 Guard, or the Naval Militia, or any service medals or badges awarded to the members of those forces, or the ribbon, button, or rosette of that badge, decoration, or medal, or any colorable imitation of that item.

(2) “Tangible benefit” means financial remuneration, an effect on the outcome of a criminal or civil court proceeding, or any benefit relating to service in the military that is provided by a federal, state, or local governmental entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 45.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

532c.

Any person, firm, corporation or copartnership who knowingly and designedly offers or gives with winning numbers at any drawing of numbers or with tickets of admission to places of public assemblage, any lot or parcel of real property and charges or collects fees in connection with the transfer thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 532a (as added by Stats. 1913, Ch. 70) by Stats. 1935, Ch. 338.)
-------------------------------------------

532d.

(a) Any person who solicits or attempts to solicit or receives money or property of any kind for a charitable, religious or eleemosynary purpose and who, directly or indirectly, makes, utters, or delivers, either orally or in writing, an unqualified statement of fact concerning the purpose or organization for which the money or property is solicited or received, or concerning the cost and expense of solicitation or the manner in which the money or property or any part thereof is to be used, which statement is in fact false and was made,
 uttered, or delivered by that person either willfully and with knowledge of its falsity or negligently without due consideration of those facts which by the use of ordinary care he or she should have known, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(b) An offense charged in violation of this section shall be proven by the testimony of one witness and corroborating circumstances.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the right of any city, county, or city and county to adopt regulations for charitable solicitations which are not in conflict with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

532e.

Any person who receives money for the purpose of obtaining or paying for services, labor, materials or equipment incident to constructing improvements on real property and willfully rebates any part of the money to or on behalf of anyone contracting with such person, for provision of the services, labor, materials or equipment for which the money was given, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that normal trade discount for prompt payment shall not be considered a violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1145.)
-------------------------------------------

532f.

(a) A person commits mortgage fraud if, with the intent to defraud, the person does any of the following:

(1) Deliberately makes any misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission during the mortgage lending process with the intention that it be relied on by a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party to the mortgage lending process.

(2) Deliberately uses or facilitates the use of any misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission, knowing the same to contain a misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission, during the mortgage lending process with the intention that it be relied on by a mortgage lender, borrower, or any other party to the mortgage lending process.

(3) Receives any proceeds or any other funds in connection with a mortgage loan closing that the person knew resulted from a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subdivision.

(4) Files or causes to be filed with the recorder of any county in connection with a mortgage loan transaction any document the person knows to contain a material misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission.

(b) In addition to those offenses listed in subdivision (a), a mortgage broker or person who originates a loan commits mortgage fraud if, with the intent to defraud, the person does either of the following:

(1) Instructs or otherwise deliberately causes a borrower to sign documents reflecting the terms of a business, commercial, or agricultural loan, with knowledge that the
 borrower intends to use the loan proceeds primarily for personal, family, or household use.

(2) Instructs or otherwise deliberately causes a borrower to sign documents reflecting the terms of a bridge loan, with knowledge that the loan proceeds will be not used to acquire or construct a new dwelling. For purposes of this subdivision, a bridge loan is any temporary loan, having a maturity of one year or less, for the purpose of acquisition or construction of a dwelling intended to become the consumer’s principal dwelling.

(c) An offense involving mortgage fraud shall not be based solely on information lawfully disclosed pursuant to federal disclosure laws, regulations, or interpretations related to the mortgage lending process.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an order for the
 production of any or all relevant records possessed by a real estate recordholder in whatever form and however stored may be issued by a judge upon a written ex parte application made under penalty of perjury by a peace officer stating that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the records sought are relevant and material to an ongoing investigation of a felony fraud violation.

(2) The ex parte application shall specify with particularity the records to be produced, which shall relate to a party or parties in the criminal investigation.

(3) Relevant records may include, but are not limited to, purchase contracts, loan applications, settlement statements, closing statements, escrow instructions, payoff demands, disbursement reports, or checks.

(4) The ex parte application and any subsequent judicial order may
 be ordered sealed by the court upon a sufficient showing that it is necessary for the effective continuation of the investigation.

(5) The records ordered to be produced shall be provided to the peace officer applicant or their designee within a reasonable time period after service of the order upon the real estate recordholder.

(e) (1) Nothing in this section shall preclude the real estate recordholder from notifying a customer of the receipt of the order for production of records, unless a court orders the real estate recordholder to withhold notification to the customer upon a finding that this notice would impede the investigation.

(2) If a court has made an order to withhold notification to the customer under this subdivision, the peace officer who or law enforcement agency that obtained
 the records shall notify the customer by delivering a copy of the ex parte order to the customer within 10 days of the termination of the investigation.

(f) (1) Nothing in this section shall preclude the real estate recordholder from voluntarily disclosing information or providing records to law enforcement upon request.

(2) This section shall not preclude a real estate recordholder, in its discretion, from initiating contact with, and thereafter communicating with and disclosing records to, appropriate state or local agencies concerning a suspected violation of any law.

(g) No real estate recordholder, or any officer, employee, or agent of the real estate recordholder, shall be liable to any person for either of the following:

(1) Disclosing information in response to an order pursuant to this section.

(2) Complying with an order under this section not to disclose to the customer the order, or the dissemination of information pursuant to the order.

(h) Any records required to be produced pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by an affidavit of a custodian of records of the real estate recordholder or other qualified witness which states, or includes in substance, all of the following:

(1) The affiant is the duly authorized custodian of the records or other qualified witness and has authority to certify the records.

(2) The identity of the records.

(3) A description of the mode of preparation
 of the records.

(4) The records were prepared by the personnel of the business in the regular course of business at or near the time of an act, condition, or event.

(5) Any copies of records described in the order are true copies.

(i) A person who violates this section is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(j) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(2) “Mortgage lending process” means the process through which a person seeks or obtains a mortgage loan, including, but not limited to, solicitation, application, origination, negotiation of terms, third-party provider services, underwriting, signing and closing, and funding of the loan.

(3) “Mortgage loan” means a loan or agreement to extend credit to a person that is secured by a deed of trust or other document representing a security interest or lien upon any interest in real property, including the renewal or refinancing of the loan.

(4) “Real estate recordholder” means any person, licensed or unlicensed, that meets any of the following conditions:

(A) Is a title insurer that engages in the “business of title insurance” as defined by Section 12340.3
 of the Insurance Code, an underwritten title company, or an escrow company.

(B) Functions as a broker or salesperson by engaging in any of the type of acts set forth in Sections 10131, 10131.1, 10131.2, 10131.3, 10131.4, and 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) Engages in the making or servicing of loans secured by real property.

(k) Fraud involving a mortgage loan may only be prosecuted under this section when the value of the alleged fraud meets the threshold for grand theft as set out in subdivision (a) of Section 487.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   (AB 3108)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

533.

Every person who, after once selling, bartering, or disposing of any tract of land or town lot, or after executing any bond or agreement for the sale of any land or town lot, again willfully and with intent to defraud previous or subsequent purchasers, sells, barters, or disposes of the same tract of land or town lot, or any part thereof, or willfully and with intent to defraud previous or subsequent purchasers, executes any bond or agreement to sell, barter, or dispose of the same land or lot, or any part thereof, to any other person for a valuable consideration, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 386.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

534.

Every person who is married or in a registered domestic partnership, who falsely and fraudulently represents himself or herself as competent to sell or mortgage any real estate, to the validity of which sale or mortgage the assent or concurrence of his or her spouse is necessary, and under such representations willfully conveys or mortgages the same, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 73.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

535.

Every person who obtains any money or property from another, or obtains the signature of another to any written instrument, the false making of which would be forgery, by means of any false or fraudulent sale of property or pretended property, by auction, or by any of the practices known as mock auctions, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, and, in addition, is disqualified for a period of three years from acting as an auctioneer in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 387.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

536.

Every commission merchant, broker, agent, factor, or consignee, who shall willfully and corruptly make, or cause to be made, to the principal or consignor of such commission merchant, agent, broker, factor, or consignee, a false statement as to the price obtained for any property consigned or entrusted for sale, or as to the quality or quantity of any property so consigned or entrusted, or as to any expenditures made in connection therewith, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof, shall be punished by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not less than two hundred dollars ($200), or by
 imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months and not less than 10 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 299.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

536a.

It is hereby made the duty of every commission merchant, broker, factor, or consignee, to whom any property is consigned or entrusted for sale, to make, when accounting therefor or subsequently, upon the written demand of his principal or consignor, a true written statement setting forth the name and address of the person or persons to whom a sale of the said property, or any portion thereof, was made, the quantity so sold to each purchaser, and the respective prices obtained therefor; provided, however, that unless separate written demand shall be made as to each consignment or shipment regarding which said statement is desired, prior to sale, it shall be sufficient to
 set forth in said statement only so many of said matters above enumerated as said commission merchant, broker, factor, or consignee may be able to obtain from the books of account kept by him; and that said statement shall not be required in case of cash sales where the amount of the transaction is less than fifty dollars. Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1909, Ch. 706.)
-------------------------------------------

537.

(a) Any person who obtains any food, fuel, services, or accommodations at a hotel, inn, restaurant, boardinghouse, lodginghouse, apartment house, bungalow court, motel, marina, marine facility, autocamp, ski area, or public or private campground, without paying therefor, with intent to defraud the proprietor or manager thereof, or who obtains credit at an hotel, inn, restaurant, boardinghouse, lodginghouse,
 apartment house, bungalow court, motel, marina, marine facility, autocamp, or public or private campground by the use of any false pretense, or who, after obtaining credit, food, fuel, services, or accommodations, at an hotel, inn, restaurant, boardinghouse, lodginghouse, apartment house, bungalow court, motel, marina, marine facility, autocamp, or public or private campground, absconds, or surreptitiously, or by force, menace, or threats, removes any part of his or her baggage therefrom with the intent not to pay for his or her food or accommodations is guilty of a public offense punishable as follows:

(1) If the value of the credit, food, fuel, services, or accommodations is nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or less, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not exceeding six months, or both.

(2) If the value of the
 credit, food, fuel, services, or accommodations is greater than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), by imprisonment in a county jail for a term of not more than one year, or in the state prison.

(b) Any person who uses or attempts to use ski area facilities for which payment is required without paying as required, or who resells a ski lift ticket to another when the resale is not authorized by the proprietor, is guilty of an infraction.

(c) Evidence that a person left the premises of such an hotel, inn, restaurant, boardinghouse, lodginghouse, apartment house, bungalow court, motel, marina, marine facility, autocamp, ski area, or public or private campground, without paying or offering to pay for such food, fuel, services, use of facilities, or accommodation, or that the person, without authorization from the proprietor, resold his or her ski lift ticket to another person after
 making use of such facilities, shall be prima facie evidence of the following:

(1) That the person obtained such food, fuel, services, use of facilities or accommodations with intent to defraud the proprietor or manager.

(2) That, if, after obtaining the credit, food, fuel, services, or accommodations, the person absconded, or surreptitiously, or by force, menace, or threats, removed part of his or her baggage therefrom, the person did so with the intent not to pay for the credit, food, fuel, services, or accommodations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 27.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

537b.

Any person who obtains any livery hire or other accommodation at any livery or feed stable, kept for profit, in this state, without paying therefor, with intent to defraud the proprietor or manager thereof; or who obtains credit at any such livery or feed stable by the use of any false pretense; or who after obtaining a horse, vehicle, or other property at such livery or feed stable, willfully or maliciously abuses the same by beating, goading, overdriving or other willful or malicious conduct, or who after obtaining such horse, vehicle, or other property, shall, with intent to defraud the owner, manager or proprietor of such livery or feed stable, keep the same for a longer
 period, or take the same to a greater distance than contracted for; or allow a feed bill or other charges to accumulate against such property, without paying therefor; or abandon or leave the same, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 537¾ by Stats. 1905, Ch. 523.)
-------------------------------------------

537c.

Every owner, manager, proprietor, or other person, having the management, charge or control of any livery stable, feed or boarding stable, and every person pasturing stock, who shall receive and take into his possession, charge, care or control, any horse, mare, or other animal, or any buggy, or other vehicle, belonging to any other person, to be by him kept, fed, or cared for, and who, while said horse, mare or other animal or buggy or other vehicle, is thus in his possession, charge, care or under his control, as aforesaid, shall drive, ride or use, or knowingly permit or allow any person other than the owner or other person entitled so to do, to drive, ride, or otherwise use
 the same, without the consent or permission of the owner thereof, or other person charged with the care, control or possession of such property, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1909, Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

537e.

(a) Any person who knowingly buys, sells, receives, disposes of, conceals, or has in his or her possession any personal property from which the manufacturer’s serial number, identification number, electronic serial number, or any other distinguishing number or identification mark has been removed, defaced, covered, altered, or destroyed, is guilty of a public offense, punishable as follows:

(1) If the value of the property does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months.

(2) If the value of the property exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
 year.

(3) If the property is an integrated computer chip or panel of a value of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or more, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(b) For purposes of this subdivision, “personal property” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Any television, radio, recorder, phonograph, telephone, piano, or any other musical instrument or sound equipment.

(2) Any washing machine, sewing machine, vacuum cleaner, or other household appliance or furnishings.

(3) Any typewriter, adding machine, dictaphone, or any other office equipment or
 furnishings.

(4) Any computer, printed circuit, integrated chip or panel, or other part of a computer.

(5) Any tool or similar device, including any technical or scientific equipment.

(6) Any bicycle, exercise equipment, or any other entertainment or recreational equipment.

(7) Any electrical or mechanical equipment, contrivance, material, or piece of apparatus or equipment.

(8) Any clock, watch, watch case, or watch movement.

(9) Any vehicle or vessel, or any component part thereof.

(c) When property described in subdivision (a) comes into the custody of a
 peace officer it shall become subject to the provision of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1407) of Title 10 of Part 2, relating to the disposal of stolen or embezzled property. Property subject to this section shall be considered stolen or embezzled property for the purposes of that chapter, and prior to being disposed of, shall have an identification mark imbedded or engraved in, or permanently affixed to it.

(d) This section does not apply to those cases or instances where any of the changes or alterations enumerated in subdivision (a) have been customarily made or done as an established practice in the ordinary and regular conduct of business, by the original manufacturer, or by his or her duly appointed direct representative, or under specific authorization from the original manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 388.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

537f.

No storage battery composed in whole or in part of a used container, or used plate or plates and intended for use in the starting, lighting or ignition of automobiles, shall be sold or offered for sale in this State unless: the word “Rebuilt” together with the rebuilder’s name and address is labeled on one side of the battery in letters not less than one-half inch in height with a one-eighth inch stroke.

Any person selling or offering for sale such a battery in violation of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than
 six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1933, Ch. 925.)
-------------------------------------------

537g.

(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, any person who knowingly removes, defaces, covers, alters or destroys a National Crime Information Center owner identification number from the personal property of another without permission is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400), imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or both.

(b) This section shall not apply to any action taken by an authorized person to dispose of property pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4 of
 Division 3 of the Civil Code or pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1407) of Title 10 of Part 2 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 878, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

538.

Every person, who, after mortgaging any of the property permitted to be mortgaged by the provisions of Sections 9102 and 9109 of the Commercial Code, excepting locomotives, engines, rolling stock of a railroad, steamboat machinery in actual use, and vessels, during the existence of the mortgage, with intent to defraud the mortgagee, his or her representative or assigns, takes, drives, carries away, or otherwise removes or permits the taking, driving, or carrying away, or other removal of the mortgaged property, or any part thereof, from
 the county where it was situated when mortgaged, without the written consent of the mortgagee, or who sells, transfers, slaughters, destroys, or in any manner further encumbers the mortgaged property, or any part thereof, or causes it to be sold, transferred, slaughtered, destroyed, or further encumbered, is guilty of theft, and is punishable accordingly. In the case of a sale, transfer, or further encumbrance at or before the time of making the sale, transfer, or encumbrance, the mortgagor informs the person to whom the sale, transfer, or encumbrance is made, of the existence of the prior mortgage, and also informs the prior mortgagee of the intended sale, transfer, or encumbrance, in writing, by giving the name and place of residence of the party to whom the sale, transfer, or encumbrance is to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

538a.

Every person who signs any letter addressed to a newspaper with the name of a person other than himself and sends such letter to the newspaper, or causes it to be sent to such newspaper, with intent to lead the newspaper to believe that such letter was written by the person whose name is signed thereto, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 480 (as added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1256) by Stats. 1972, Ch. 449.)
-------------------------------------------

538b.

Any person who wilfully wears the badge, lapel button, rosette, or any part of the garb, robe, habit, or any other recognized and established insignia or apparel of any secret society, or fraternal or religious order or organization, or of any sect, church or religious denomination, or uses the same to obtain aid or assistance within this State, with intent to deceive, unless entitled to wear and use the same under the constitution, by-laws or rules and regulations, or other laws or enactments of such society, order, organization, sect, church or religious denomination is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

538c.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any person who attaches or inserts an unauthorized advertisement in a newspaper, whether alone or in concert with another, and who redistributes it to the public or who has the intent to redistribute it to the public, is guilty of the crime of theft of advertising services which shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Unauthorized
 advertisement” means any form of representation or communication, including any handbill, newsletter, pamphlet, or notice that contains any letters, words, or pictorial representation that is attached to or inserted in a newspaper without a contractual agreement between the publisher and an advertiser.

(2) “Newspaper” includes any newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other tangible publication, whether offered for retail sale or distributed without charge.

(c) This section does not apply if the publisher or authorized distributor of the newspaper consents to the attachment or insertion of the advertisement.

(d) This section does not apply to a newspaper distributor who is directed to insert an unauthorized advertisement by a person or company supplying the newspapers, and who is not aware that the advertisement is
 unauthorized.

(e) A conviction under this section shall not constitute a conviction for petty theft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

538d.

(a) Any person other than one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing, of a law enforcement officer, with the intent of fraudulently impersonating a
 law enforcement officer, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a law enforcement officer, or who willfully and credibly impersonates a law enforcement officer through or on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) (1) Any person, other than the one who by law is given the authority of a
 law enforcement officer, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the badge of a law enforcement officer with the intent of fraudulently impersonating a law enforcement officer, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a law enforcement officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year,
 by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Any person who willfully wears or uses any badge that falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, or which so resembles the authorized badge of a law enforcement officer as would deceive any ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a
 law enforcement officer, for the purpose of fraudulently impersonating a law enforcement officer, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a law enforcement officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand
 dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses, or who willfully makes, sells, loans, gives, or transfers to another, any badge, insignia, emblem, device, or any label, certificate, card, or writing, which falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, or which so resembles the authorized badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of a
 law enforcement officer as would deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, except that any person who makes or sells any badge under the circumstances described in this subdivision is subject to a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(2) A local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction that files charges
 against a person for a violation of paragraph (1) shall seize the badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing described in paragraph (1).

(d) (1) The head of an agency that employs peace officers, as defined in Sections 830.1 and 830.2, is authorized to issue identification in the form of a badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing that clearly states that the person has honorably retired following service as a peace officer from that agency. The identification authorized pursuant to this subdivision is separate and distinct from the identification authorized by Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(2) If the head of an agency issues a badge to an
 honorably retired peace officer that is not affixed to a plaque or other memento commemorating the retiree’s service for the agency, the words “Honorably Retired” shall be clearly visible above, underneath, or on the badge itself.

(3) The head of an agency that employs peace officers as defined in Sections 830.1 and 830.2 is authorized to revoke identification granted pursuant to this subdivision in the event of misuse or abuse.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “honorably retired” does not include an officer who has agreed to a service retirement in lieu of termination.

(e) (1) Vendors of law enforcement uniforms shall verify that a person purchasing a uniform identifying a law enforcement agency
 is an employee of the agency identified on the uniform. Presentation and examination of a valid identification card with a picture of the person purchasing the uniform and identification, on the letterhead of the law enforcement agency, of the person buying the uniform as an employee of the agency identified on the uniform shall be sufficient verification.

(2) Any uniform vendor who sells a uniform identifying a law enforcement agency, without verifying that the purchaser is an employee of the agency, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) This subdivision shall not apply if the uniform is to be used solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, video production, or a theatrical event, and prior written permission has
 been obtained from the identified law enforcement agency.

(f) Solely for purposes of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section, “law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined in Section 830, and any federal law enforcement officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 126, Sec. 3.   (SB 805)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

538e.

(a) Any person, other than an officer or member of a fire department, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a fire department or the Office of the State Fire Marshal, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a fire department or the Office of the State Fire Marshal, or who willfully and credibly impersonates such an officer or member on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) (1) Any person, other than the one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the badge of a fire department or the Office of the State Fire Marshal with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer, or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Any person who willfully wears or uses any badge that falsely purports
 to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, or which so resembles the authorized badge of an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal as would deceive any ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, for the purpose of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment
 and fine.

(c) Any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses, or who willfully makes, sells, loans, gives, or transfers to another, any badge, insignia, emblem, device, or any label, certificate, card, or writing, which falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer, or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, or which so resembles the authorized badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal as would deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for use by an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, is guilty of a misdemeanor, except that any person who makes or sells any badge under the circumstances
 described in this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).
